Utah statutes.
17D-1-207.   Public hearing.

(1)  On the date and at the time and place specified in the notice under Section 17D-1-205, the legislative body of the county or municipality by which the special service district is proposed to be created shall hold a public hearing.

(2)  At each public hearing under this section, the legislative body shall:

(a)  give full consideration to each written protest that has been filed; and

(b)  hear and consider each interested person desiring to be heard.

(3)  The legislative body may continue the hearing to another date and time.

